Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 46
MINING EQUIPMENT - OWNERSHIP

Section

34-46-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Mining equipment" includes all parts of a mine plant or any equipment used in connection with any such plant, whether the same is underground or on the surface, which contributes or may contribute to the mining, treatment, or handling of ores, or any metalliferous or nonmetalliferous mineral products, and, without restriction, such generalization includes any new or used tools, track, cars, pipe, cable, timber, belting, houses, tents, or treatment plants or parts thereof, of the value when new of not less than twenty-five dollars.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 540, § 1.

CSA:

C. 110, § 332.

CRS 53:

§ 92-36-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-35-1.

34-46-102. Written evidence of ownership required.

It is unlawful for any person to have in his possession any mining equipment acquired after April 16, 1941, without the written evidence of ownership or right of possession.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 540, § 2.

CSA:

C. 110, § 333.

CRS 53:

§ 92-36-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-35-2.

34-46-103. Prohibiting destruction, appropriation, or deprivation of use.

It is unlawful for any person to destroy or appropriate to his own use any mining equipment of which he is not the lawful owner and possessor or to deprive the lawful owner and possessor of the use or possession thereof.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 540, § 3.

CSA:

C. 110, § 334.

CRS 53:

§ 92-36-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-35-3.

34-46-104. When transportation prohibited except by railroad.

It is unlawful to transport any used mining equipment except by railroad transportation without first obtaining written evidence of ownership or right of possession thereof by the person transporting the same, or satisfying the local sheriff or other peace officers of the county in which machinery is located that the person desiring to move such used machinery or equipment as defined in section 34-46-101 is responsible and has a legal right to move such used machinery or equipment. Such evidence shall, upon demand of any peace officer or Colorado state trooper, be exhibited, and unless so exhibited, any such officer shall take possession of such mining equipment at the expense, if any, of the shipper and shall hold the same until the provisions of this article have been complied with.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 541, § 4.

CSA:

C. 110, § 335.

CRS 53:

§ 92-36-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-35-4.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1696, § 103, effective August 7.

34-46-105. Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this article commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 541, § 5.

CSA:

C. 110, § 336.

CRS 53:

§ 92-36-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-35-5.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 882, § 59, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 848, § 124, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1546, § 302, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 54 (1980).

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

34-46-106. Possession prima facie unlawful - when.

Upon the trial of any person charged with the theft or unlawful possession of mining equipment, or with the violation of any provision of this article, the possession by such person of such mining equipment without written evidence of ownership or right of possession shall be prima facie evidence that such possession is unlawful.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 541, § 6.

CSA:

C. 110, § 337.

CRS 53:

§ 92-36-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-35-6.